District of Columbia statutes.
34-808.02

Supervision and regulation considerations.

In supervising and regulating utility or energy companies, the Commission shall consider the public safety, the economy of the District, the conservation of natural resources, and the preservation of environmental quality.

History

Mar. 4, 1913, ch. 50, § 8, par. 96A
as added Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 401, 55 DCR 9225
redesignated as par. 97B, Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 45(a), 59 DCR 6190

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 redesignated the Act of Mar. 4, 1913, ch. 150, § 8, par. 96A as the Act of Mar. 4, 1913, ch. 150, § 8, par. 97B.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 401 of Clean and Affordable Energy Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-508, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10856).